Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2 H AZARDOUS SITE RESPONSE
12-8-96.1. Liability for cleanup costs; punitive damages; action for recovery of costs and damages; claims for contribution.

Each and every person who contributed to a release of a hazardous waste, a hazardous constituent, or a hazardous substance shall be jointly, severally, and strictly liable to the State of Georgia for the reasonable costs of activities associated with the cleanup of environmental hazards, including legal expenses incurred by the state pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-96, as a result of the failure of such person to comply with an order issued by the director. Any such person shall be so liable notwithstanding the absence of the issuance of an order to such person pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-96 if the director is unable to identify such person prior to the commencement of clean-up action after making a reasonable effort to do so pursuant to such Code section, or if such person contributed to a release which resulted in an emergency action by the director and issuance of such an order would cause a delay in corrective action that could endanger human health and the environment. The person may, in addition, be liable for punitive damages in an amount at least equal to the costs incurred by the state and not more than three times the costs incurred by the state for activities associated with the cleanup of environmental hazards. Costs and damages incurred by the state may be recovered in a civil action instituted in the name of the director. All costs recovered by the state pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited into the hazardous waste trust fund.

Any action for the recovery of costs and for punitive damages shall be commenced within six years of the date on which all costs have been incurred.

No person shall be liable for costs or damages pursuant to this Code section if he can show by a preponderance of the evidence that the release of a hazardous waste, a hazardous constituent, or a hazardous substance was caused solely by:

An act of God;

An act of war;

An act or omission of a third party other than an employee or agent of the person or other than one whose act or omission occurs in connection with a contractual relationship, existing directly or indirectly, with the person, if the person establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that:

He had no relationship with the third party nor exercised any control over activities of the third party; and

He took precautions against foreseeable acts or omissions of any such third party and the consequences that could foreseeably result from such acts or omissions; or

Any combination of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

For purposes of paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section, a contractual relationship may be conclusively established by, but not limited to, land contracts, deeds, or other instruments transferring title or possession, unless the real property on which the disposal or release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances has occurred or is occurring was acquired by the person after the disposal or release of the hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances and one or more of the following circumstances are established by a preponderance of the evidence:

At the time the person acquired the site, the person did not know and had no reason to know that any hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance had been disposed of or released at the site;

The person is a government entity which acquired the site by escheat, through any other involuntary transfer or acquisition, or through the exercise of eminent domain by purchase or condemnation; or

The person acquired the site by inheritance or bequest

and that one or more of the circumstances described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section are applicable.

To establish that the person had no reason to know as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the person must have undertaken, at the time of acquisition, all appropriate inquiries into the previous ownership and uses of the property consistent with good commercial or customary practice in an effort to minimize liability. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the finder of fact shall take into account any specialized knowledge or experience on the part of the person, the relationship of the purchase price to the value of the property if uncontaminated, commonly known or reasonably ascertainable information about the property, the obviousness of the presence or likely presence of contamination at the property, and the ability to detect such contamination by appropriate inspection.

Nothing in this subsection shall diminish the liability of any previous owner of such property who would otherwise be liable under this part. Notwithstanding this paragraph, if a person obtained actual knowledge of the disposal or release of a hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance at the site when the person owned the real property and then subsequently transferred ownership of the property to another person without disclosing such knowledge, the person so transferring the property shall be treated as liable under subsection (a) of this Code section, and no defense under subsection (c) of this Code section shall be available to such person. Nothing in this subsection shall affect the liability under this part of a person who, by any act or omission, causes or contributes to the disposal or release of a hazardous waste, a hazardous constituent, or a hazardous substance which is the subject of the action relating to the site.

During or following the undertaking of any corrective action, any person may seek contribution from any other person who has contributed or is contributing to any release of a hazardous waste, a hazardous constituent, or a hazardous substance. Such claims for contribution shall be governed by the law of this state. In resolving contribution claims, the court may allocate costs among liable parties using such equitable factors as the court determines to be appropriate. In any action filed by the director for the recovery of costs and damages pursuant to this Code section, any third-party claim for contribution may, upon the motion of the director, be severed and maintained as a separate action.

A person who has voluntarily agreed to perform corrective action pursuant to an administrative consent order with the director shall not be liable for claims for contribution regarding matters addressed in the administrative consent order. Such administrative consent order does not discharge any other person who has contributed or is contributing to a release of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances unless the terms of the administrative consent order so provide, and the other persons remain liable for any corrective action deemed necessary by the director but not agreed to in the administrative consent order.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-96.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 5.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "paragraph" was substituted for "paragraphs" in the undesignated language following subparagraph (d)(1)(C).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "constituents" was substituted for "constitutents" near the middle of the introductory language in paragraph (d)(1).

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005).
For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 59 (2002).

12-8-96.2. Limitation of liability of corrective action contractors.

No corrective action contractor engaged in activities associated with the cleanup of environmental hazards created by others shall be liable for any damages arising from the release of a hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance resulting from such activity in an amount greater than $1 million to any one person or $3 million to all persons for a single occurrence. The limitation of liability of this Code section shall not:

Affect any right of indemnification which such person has, or may acquire by contract, against any other person who is liable for creating an environmental hazard; or

Apply to persons who intentionally, wantonly, or willfully violate federal or state regulations in the cleanup process.

For purposes of Code Section 12-8-96.1 and this Code section, the phrase "activities associated with the cleanup of environmental hazards" shall mean activities including investigation, evaluation, planning, design, engineering, removal, construction, and ancillary services which are carried out to abate or cleanup a hazardous waste, hazardous constituent, or hazardous substance.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to be a waiver of the sovereign immunity of this state or of any agency or political subdivision of this state.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-96.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-96.3. Limitation of liability for release of hazardous substances for subsequent purchasers of property.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Affected property" means real property listed on the hazardous site inventory maintained pursuant to Code Section 12-8-97.

"Bona fide purchaser" means a person who has purchased affected property and has complied with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section relative to such property; provided, however, that no person may qualify as a bona fide purchaser if such person:

Is a person who has contributed or is contributing to a release;

Has or in the past has had a contractual relationship with a person who has contributed or is contributing to a release;

Is related by blood or marriage to a previous owner of the property or to a person who contributed or is contributing to the release or is a shareholder, employee, agent, or is otherwise affiliated with such person;

Is a predecessor or successor entity, subsidiary, owner, or division of any person who has contributed to or is contributing to a release;

Is in violation of any order, judgment, statute, rule, or regulation within the jurisdiction of the division;

Is an owner or operator of an underground storage tank, as defined by Code Section 12-13-3, located at the affected property and subject to the financial responsibility regulations promulgated pursuant to Code Section 12-13-9;

Is an owner or operator of a solid waste handling, disposal, or thermal treatment technology facility, as defined by Code Section 12-8-22, located at the affected property and subject to permitting requirements pursuant to Code Section 12-8-24;

Is an owner or operator of a "hazardous waste facility" as defined by paragraph (11) of Code Section 12-8-62; or

"Cleanup standards" means those rules adopted by the board pursuant to Code Section 12-8-93.

"Contractual relationship" means a contractual relationship established as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 12-8-96.1.

"Person who has contributed or is contributing to a release" means such term as defined in paragraph (9) of Code Section 12-8-92.

A person desiring to qualify as a bona fide purchaser shall, before purchasing the affected property, present to the director a corrective action plan which describes in detail those actions needed to bring the affected property into compliance with cleanup standards. The director shall approve the plan if, in his or her opinion, the plan will bring the property into compliance with the cleanup standards. Such plan shall include a schedule for completion, which shall be not longer than one year following the date the plan is finally approved, which shall be the date the purchaser and the director enter into an administrative consent order incorporating the plan; provided, however, that the director may extend the completion date by up to six months if, in his or her opinion, the purchaser has made a good faith attempt to complete the corrective action within the time provided in the consent order and that the corrective action can be completed within the period of the extension. If the corrective action provided for in the administrative consent order is completed to the satisfaction of the director, the director shall certify that the purchaser is a bona fide purchaser of the affected property for purposes of this Code section.

A bona fide purchaser shall not be liable for third-party claims for contribution or for third-party claims for damages arising from a release of the hazardous waste, hazardous substance, or hazardous constituent which is the subject of the corrective action included in the consent order provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The limitation of liability provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section shall commence on the date of execution of the consent order provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section; provided, however, that such limitation shall be withdrawn automatically if the director determines at the end of the cleanup period or any extension thereof to certify that the property has not been brought into compliance with the cleanup standards. The limitation shall apply only to the parties to the consent order and for the hazardous waste, hazardous substance, or hazardous constituent addressed in the consent order. The limitation shall not apply with respect to any release occurring in conjunction with an activity related to a corrective action which results in injury to a person not a party to the consent order.

Is not able to meet such other criteria as may be established by the board pursuant to Code Section

12-8-93

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-96.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 993, § 3.)

Law reviews.

-
For review of 1996 waste management legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 54 (1996).

12-8-97. Hazardous site inventory.

Beginning on July 1, 1994, the division shall compile and update as necessary an inventory of all known or suspected sites where hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances have been disposed of or released in quantities deemed reportable by rules or regulations of the board. At least annually, beginning July 1, 1994, the division shall send a copy of the inventory with the sites listed by county to the clerk of each superior court of the state, who shall place and maintain the most current copy of the inventory in the room or rooms in which the deed records of the county are kept. This inventory shall be called the hazardous site inventory. The inventory shall include:

The name of the property or another description identifying the site;

The location of the site;

The name of the owner of the site at the time of the site's inclusion in the inventory;

A general description of the type and quantity of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances known or suspected to be at the site;

A general description of possible or known threats to human health or the environment posed by the site;

The status of any cleanup activities conducted by any person;

A relative priority for cleanup;

If a site is determined, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board, to require corrective action, a designation that corrective action is needed and a summary of needed actions;

If a site is considered not capable of posing or is no longer posing an environmental or human health hazard, a designation that no further action is required; and

The status of any actions contesting a determination that corrective action is needed.

The division shall also publish in print or electronically annually a report of the fees collected and the funds appropriated to the hazardous waste trust fund and an accounting of all disbursements from such trust fund.

After July 1, 1993, the property owner of any site listed on the inventory which is designated as having a known release and which is designated as needing corrective action shall include the following notice in any deed, mortgage, deed to secure debt, lease, rental agreement, or other instrument given or caused to be given by the property owner which creates an interest in or grants a use of the property:

"This property has been listed on the state's hazardous site inventory and has been designated as needing corrective action due to the presence of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances regulated under state law.
Contact the property owner or the Georgia Environmental Protection Division for further information concerning this property. This notice is provided in compliance with the Georgia Hazardous Site Response Act."

After July 1, 1993, each property owner who owns a site listed on the inventory which is designated as having a known release and which is designated as needing corrective action shall cause to be prepared an affidavit of such fact in recordable form as set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 44-2-20 and shall file such affidavit with the clerk of the superior court of each county in which the real property or any part thereof lies. Such affidavit shall be recorded in the clerk's deed records pursuant to Code Section 44-2-20. Such affidavit shall include a statement that the property has been listed on the state's hazardous site inventory and has been designated as needing corrective action due to the presence of hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances regulated under state law. Such affidavit shall be filed with the clerk within 45 days after receipt of notice by the property owner that the director has designated the property as needing corrective action; provided, however, that neither the affidavit required by this subsection or the notice required by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be required until any contest under subsection (f) of this Code section has been resolved adversely to the property owner.

After July 1, 1993, each property owner who owns real property upon which hazardous wastes, hazardous constituents, or hazardous substances have been disposed of or released in amounts exceeding reportable quantities shall, within 30 days of receipt of knowledge by the property owner of the release or disposal, notify the division in writing on such forms as may be provided by the director. This notification shall include the location, type, quantity, and date of such disposal or release, if known, and a summary of actions taken to investigate, clean up, or remediate the site. Such notification shall include a quadrangle map prepared in accordance with the National Ocean Survey/National Geodetic Survey or a Georgia Coordinate System pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 4 of Title 44 that clearly indicates the location of the disposal or release; provided, however, that any property owner that has notified the United States Environmental Protection Agency under Section 103(c) of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, may satisfy this notification requirement by submitting a copy of the 103(c) notice together with such quadrangle map.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be applicable to emissions regulated under Article 1 of Chapter 9 of this title, "The Georgia Air Quality Act," point source discharges regulated under Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act," or sites regulated solely by Chapter 13 of this title, the "Georgia Underground Storage Tank Act," or substances regulated under Chapter 12 of this title, the "Georgia Asbestos Safety Act."

The director shall provide a property owner with written notice of any determination to designate property as needing corrective action, including a statement concerning the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section. The requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall be stayed by the filing of a petition for a hearing in accordance with Code Section

12-8-73

within 30 days of the issuance of the director's written notice of the director's determination to designate property as needing corrective action.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-97

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 8; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "clean up" was substituted for "cleanup" in the second sentence in subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2010, p. 838,

§

10(29)/SB 388, which amended this Code section, purported to amend paragraph (a)(10) but actually amended the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (a).